Massachusetts, session 194th, H3980.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 1D the following section:
Section 1E. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the school
committee of any city, town, or school district shall establish a LGBTQIA+ (Lesbian, Gay,
Bisexual, Transgender, Queer, Intersex, Asexual, or another identity on the Queer spectrum)
parent advisory council. Membership shall be offered to all parents who identify themselves as
LGBTQIA+ or have children who identify as LGBTQIA+, and other interested parties.
The duties of the council shall include, but not be limited to: (i) advising the school
committee on matters that pertain to the education and safety of LGBTQIA+ students; (ii)
meeting regularly with school officials to participate in the planning, development and
evaluation of the school district’s programs; (iii) participating in the review of school
improvement plans under section 59C of chapter 71 and district improvement plans under
of 2

section 1I of chapter 69. Upon request from a parent advisory council, each school committee or
school council within that parent advisory council's district shall meet at least annually with the
council; provided, however, that if the parent advisory council advises a charter school the board
of the charter school shall, upon request from the parent advisory council, meet not less than
annually with the council. The parent advisory council shall establish by-laws regarding officers
and operational procedures. In the course of its duties under this section, the council shall receive
assistance from the school committee without charge, upon reasonable notice, and subject to the
availability of staff and resources. SECTION 2. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall adopt, promulgate, amend and rescind rules and regulations or formulate policies
and make recommendations as necessary to implement this act. SECTION 3. This act shall take
effect on January 1, 2027
of 2